Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-201
Township organization; adoption.

At any general election that may be held in the several counties of the state, the qualified voters in any county may vote for or against township organization in such county.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 1, p. 131;

R.S.1913, § 987;

C.S.1922, § 887;

C.S.1929, § 26-201;

R.S.1943, § 23-201.

1. Officers

2. Vacancies

3. Construction

1. Officers

Township organization is provided for and affords supervisors, who divide the county into townships. Franek v. Butler County, 126 Neb. 797, 254 N.W. 489 (1934).

Under former law, cities entitled to two supervisors voted as one district and for both supervisors. State ex rel. Brown v. Welsh, 62 Neb. 721, 87 N.W. 529 (1901).

Member of board is township officer and should address his resignation to town clerk. State ex rel. Godard v. Taylor, 26 Neb. 580, 42 N.W. 729 (1889).

Commissioners act until supervisors are organized. State ex rel. Lichty v. Musselman, 20 Neb. 174, 29 N.W. 307 (1886).

Adoption of township organization does not shorten term of county officers. State ex rel. Crossley v. Hedlund, 16 Neb. 566, 20 N.W. 876 (1884).

2. Vacancies

Vacancies in cities are filled by mayor and council. State ex rel. Truesdell v. Plambeck, 36 Neb. 401, 54 N.W. 667 (1893).

Vacancies on temporary organization of town should be filled by county clerk. State ex rel. Davis v. Forney, 21 Neb. 223, 31 N.W. 802 (1887).

3. Construction

York County stated to have adopted township form of government. Thompson v. James, 125 Neb. 350, 250 N.W. 237 (1933).

Act of 1895 relating to township organization sustained as constitutional. Van Horn v. State ex rel. Abbott, 46 Neb. 62, 64 N.W. 365 (1895).

The several statutes on township organization should be construed together. Albert v. Twohig, 35 Neb. 563, 53 N.W. 582 (1892).